Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 43.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201086-5,100
Network Nebraska;
development and maintenance; access; Chief Information Officer; duties; cost; report.

The Chief Information Officer, in partnership with the University
of Nebraska, shall develop and maintain a statewide, multipurpose, high capacity,
scalable telecommunications network to be called Network Nebraska. The network
shall consist of contractual arrangements with providers to meet the demand
of state agencies, local governments, and educational entities as defined
in section 79-1201.01. Such network shall provide access to a reliable and
affordable infrastructure capable of carrying a spectrum of services and applications,
including distance education, across the state. The Chief Information Officer
shall provide access to each school district, each educational service unit,
each community college, each state college, and the University of Nebraska
at the earliest feasible date and no later than July 1, 2012. Access may be
provided through educational service units or other aggregation points. Participation in Network Nebraska shall
not be required for any educational entity. The Chief Information
Officer shall aggregate demand for those state agencies and educational entities
choosing to participate and shall reduce costs for participants whenever feasible.
The Chief Information Officer shall establish a cost structure based on actual
costs, including necessary administrative expenses but not including administrative travel
or conference expenses, and shall charge participants according
to such cost structure. The
Chief Information Officer shall annually provide a detailed report of such
costs to each participant and to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst.

Laws 2006, LB 1208, § 30;

Laws 2007, LB603, § 33;

Laws 2010, LB1071, § 43.
April 15, 2010